Oklahoma, session 2025, SB823.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2812, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2812. A. Subject to the provisions of subsection B of


Section 2813 of this title, a manufactured home which is located on


land owned by the owner of the manufactured home shall be listed and


assessed in the county in which it is located for ad valorem


taxation as real property pursuant to the provisions of the Ad


Valorem Tax Code. The person owning and residing in such


manufactured home may apply for homestead exemption. The county

Req. No. 1552 Page 1


assessor shall approve the application of such person if all


requirements of law for such exemption have been met.


B. A manufactured home which is located on land not owned by


the owner of the manufactured home shall be listed and assessed in


the county in which it is located for ad valorem taxation as


personal property pursuant to the provisions of the Ad Valorem Tax


Code. Provided, if the manufactured home is located on land not


owned by the owner of the manufactured home, and it is the actual


residence of the owner and otherwise meets the requirements for a


homestead as provided in Section 2888 of this title, the person


owning and residing in such manufactured home may apply for


homestead exemption.


C. Each year that a manufactured home is subject to ad valorem


taxes as provided by law, the county assessor and the county


treasurer shall transmit the information relating to ad valorem tax


payment to the Oklahoma Tax Commission, which shall identify the


manufactured home and record the payment in the computer data system


provided for by Section 1113 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


The county assessor and treasurer of each county shall provide such


information as may be required in order to implement the provisions


of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2888, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 1552 Page 2


Section 2888. A. 1. The term “homestead”, as used in the


provisions of the Ad Valorem Tax Code governing homestead


exemptions, shall mean and include the actual residence of a natural


person who is a citizen of this state, provided the record actual


ownership of such residence be vested in such natural person


residing and domiciled thereon. Any single person of legal age,


married couple and their minor child or children or the minor child


or children of a deceased person, whether residing together or


separated, or surviving spouse shall be allowed under Section 2801


et seq. of this title only one homestead exemption in this state.


No person or the family of such person shall be required to be


domiciled thereon if such person is in the armed service of the


United States in time of war or during a state of national emergency


as declared by the Congress or the President of the United States,


and such person shall not be required to be domiciled thereon in


order to assert or claim the exemption provided in Section 2889 of


this title, and such exemption may be claimed by any agent of, or


member of the family of, such person. The surviving spouse and/or


minor children of a deceased person shall be considered record


owners of the homestead where the title of record in the office of


the county clerk on January 1 is in the name of the deceased, but in


all other cases the deed or other evidence of ownership must be of


record in the office of the county clerk on January 1 in order for


any person to be qualified as the record owner. However, a natural

Req. No. 1552 Page 3


person actually owning, residing and domiciled in the residence on


January 1 shall be deemed to be the record owner of the residence on


January 1, within the meaning of this section, if the deed or other


evidence of ownership of such person, executed on or before January


1, be of record in the office of the county clerk on or before


February 1 immediately following. Despite any provision to the


contrary in this section, if a parent or parents residing and


domiciled in the residence own the residence jointly with one or


more of their children, whether residing together or separated, and


where the record joint ownership of the property is recorded in the


office of the county clerk in accordance with the provisions of this


section, the parent or parents residing and domiciled in the


residence shall be entitled to the entire homestead exemption. A


rural homestead shall not include more than one hundred sixty (160)


acres of land and the improvements thereon. An urban homestead


shall not include any land except the lot or lots, or the unplatted


tract, upon which are located the dwelling, garage, barn and/or


other outbuildings necessary or convenient for family use. A


homestead shall include a manufactured home or a fixed structure


located on land not owned by the owner, as provided in Section 2812


of this title.


2. Despite any provision to the contrary in this section, the


person actually owning, residing and domiciled in the residence as


of the date of a tornado shall be deemed to be the record owner of

Req. No. 1552 Page 4


the residence on such date, within the meaning of this section, if


the deed or other evidence of ownership of such person, executed on


or before such date, be of record in the office of the county clerk


on or before such date. However, the provisions of this paragraph


shall only apply to any person who is eligible to claim the income


tax credit pursuant to Section 2357.29A of this title with respect


to a tornado or to any person whose primary residence was damaged or


destroyed in a tornado and who purchased or built a new primary


residence at a location within this state other than the location of


the damaged or destroyed residence. For the purposes of this


section, “tornado” means a tornado which occurred in calendar year


2013 or any subsequent tornado for which a Presidential Major


Disaster Declaration was issued.


B. The term “rural homestead” as used herein shall mean and


include any homestead located outside a city or town or outside any


platted subdivision or addition.


C. The term “urban homestead” as used herein shall mean and


include any homestead located within any city or town whether


incorporated or unincorporated, or located within a platted


subdivision or addition, whether such subdivision or addition be a


part of a city or town. In no case shall an urban homestead exceed


in area one (1) acre.


D. For purposes of the provisions of Section 8E and Section 8F


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, if a disabled veteran,

Req. No. 1552 Page 5


the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran or the surviving spouse


of a person who died while in the line of duty occupies improvements


which are affixed to the real property and record title to such real


property is held by a city or town or an entity formed pursuant to


the charter provisions or ordinances of a city or town or formed


under other provisions of law for the benefit of such city or town,


the improvements shall be considered to be the homestead of such


disabled veteran or the surviving spouse of such disabled veteran


for all purposes related to the homestead exemption authorized by


the provisions of the Ad Valorem Tax Code and the homestead


exemption shall not be denied on the basis that title to such


affixed improvements is held by a disabled veteran or surviving


spouse or an entity formed by them than the city or town which holds


title to the real property consisting of the land to which such


improvements are affixed.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2889, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2889. Homesteads, as defined in Section 2888 of this


title, are hereby classified for the purpose of taxation as provided


in Section 22 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. All


homesteads in this state shall be assessed for taxation the same as


other real and personal property therein, except that each


homestead, as defined by Section 2801 et seq. of this title, shall


be exempted from all forms of ad valorem taxation to the extent of

Req. No. 1552 Page 6


One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) the full amount of the assessed


valuation.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1552 QD 1/19/2025 5:44:08 AM







































Req. No. 1552 Page 7